Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-106
Presiding judge; daily record of proceedings.

When the court of impeachment is composed of the judges of the Court of Appeals, the Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals shall act as the presiding judge of the court of impeachment, and in all other cases the Chief Justice shall preside. The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall keep a full record of each day's proceedings in a book to be specially provided for that purpose, and each day's proceedings shall be signed by the presiding judge. The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall always be the custodian of the book.

Laws 1879, § 6, p. 83;

R.S.1913, § 1133;

C.S.1922, § 1062;

C.S.1929, § 27-106;

R.S.1943, § 24-106;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 29.